sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Príslušenstvo k anténam: Anténové káble a pigtaily; Uzemnenie antén a inštalačný hardvér; Držiaky a konzoly na anténu; Anténne rotátory; Anténové tunery; Baluny a duplexery; Bleskozvodové zvodače a prepäťové ochrany; RF adaptéry a konektory; Satelitné LNB  zariadenie; Rozdeľovače, kombinéry a distribučné systémy
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Antenų priedai: Antenos kabeliai ir pigtail laidai; Antenos įžeminimo ir montavimo įranga; Antenų laikikliai ir tvirtinimo elementai; Antenų rotatoriai; Antenos derintuvai; Simetrinimo įtaisai ir duplekseriai; Žaibo ribotuvai ir viršįtampių apsaugos; RF adapteriai ir jungtys; Palydoviniai konverteriai; Skirstytuvai, sumatoriai ir paskirstymo sistemos
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 天線配件: 天線線材與尾纖; 天線接地與安裝五金; 天線座和天線托架; 天線旋轉器; 天線調諧器; 平衡-不平衡轉換器與雙工器; 避雷器與突波保護器; RF 轉接頭與連接器; 衛星訊號集波器; 分配器、結合器與分配系統
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Acessórios para antenas: Cabos de antena e pigtails; Ferragens de aterramento e instalação de antena; Suportes para antenas; Rotores de antena; Sintonizadores de antena; Baluns e duplexadores; Para-raios e protetores contra surtos; Adaptadores e conectores RF; LNBs; Divisores, combinadores e sistemas de distribuição
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Accessoires pour antennes: Câbles et rallonges pour antenne; Matériel de mise à la terre et d’installation d’antenne; Supports pour antenne; Systèmes de rotation pour antenne; Accordeurs pour antenne; Baluns et duplexeurs; Parafoudres et parasurtenseurs; Adaptateurs et connecteurs RF; Blocs-convertisseurs à faible bruit; Répartiteurs, coupleurs et systèmes de distribution pour antenne
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 天线配件: 天线电缆和尾线; 天线接地与安装硬件; 天线座与天线架; 天线旋转器; 天线调谐器; 巴伦与双工器; 避雷器和浪涌保护器; 射频适配器和连接器; 卫星高频头; 分路器、合路器和分配系统
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Antennetilbehør: Antennekabler og pigtails; Maskinvare til jording og installasjon av antenner; Antennefester og -braketter; Antennerotatorer; Antennetunere; Baluner og dupleksere; Lynavledere og overspenningsvern; RF-adaptere og koblinger; Satellitt-LNB-er; Splittere, kombinatorer og distribusjonssystemer
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Pribor za antene: Antenski kabel i pletenice; Uzemljenje antene i hardver za instalaciju; Nosači i držači za antene; Rotatori antena; Antenski tuneri; Baluni i duplekseri; Odvodnici struje munje i zaštita od prenapona; RF adapteri i konektori; LNB za antenu; Razdjelnici, kombinatori i distribucijski sustavi
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Dodatki za antene: Kabli in pigtaili za antene; Ozemljitvena in instalacijska oprema za antene; Nosilci in držala za antene; Antenski rotatorji; Nastavljalniki anten; Baluni in duplekserji; Odvodniki za strele in prenapetostne zaščite; RF adapterji in konektorji; Nizkošumni blokovni pretvorniki; Razdelilniki, združevalniki in distribucijski sistemi
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Аксесоари за антени: Кабели и пигтейли за антена; Средства за заземяване и монтаж на антена; Стойки и скоби за антени; Ротатори на антени; Тунери за антена; Балуни и дуплексери; Мълниеотводи и предпазители от пренапрежение; RF адаптери и конектори; Сателитни конвертори (LNB); Сплитери, комбинатори и разпределителни системи
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Accesorios para antenas: Cables y pigtails de antena; Elementos de puesta a tierra y herrajes de instalación para antenas; Escuadras y soportes para antenas; Rotadores de antenas; Sintonizadores de antena; Baluns y duplexores; Pararrayos y protectores de sobretensión; Adaptadores y conectores RF; LNB para satélite; Divisores, combinadores y sistemas de distribución
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Antenne – tilbehør: Antennekabler og pigtails; Antennejordings- og installationshardware; Antenne – montering og beslag; Antenne – roteringsbeslag; Antennetunere; Baluner og duplekser; Lynafledere og overspændingsbeskyttere; RF-adaptere og -stik; Satellit-LNB'er; Fordelere, kombinatorer og distributionssystemer
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 안테나 부대용품: 안테나 케이블 및 피그테일; 안테나 접지 및 설치 하드웨어; 안테나 마운트/브래킷; 안테나 회전기; 안테나 튜너; 밸런 및 듀플렉서; 낙뢰 방지기 및 서지 보호기; RF 어댑터 및 커넥터; 위성 LNB; 스플리터, 결합기 및 분배 시스템
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Anten Aksesuarları: Anten Kabloları ve Pigtailler; Anten Topraklama ve Kurulum Donanımı; Anten Montaj Kitleri ve Braketleri; Anten Döndürücüler; Anten Tunerleri; Balunlar ve Dupleksörler; Yıldırım Koruyucuları ve Aşırı Gerilim Koruyucuları; RF Adaptörler ve Konektörler; Uydu LNB'leri; Bölücüler, Birleştiriciler ve Dağıtım Sistemleri
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > アンテナ関連用品: アンテナケーブル・ピグテール; アンテナ接地・取付金具; アンテナ取付金具; アンテナローテーター; アンテナチューナー; バラン・デュプレクサー; 避雷器・サージプロテクター; RFアダプター・コネクター; 衛星放送用LNB; スプリッター・コンバイナー・分配システム
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Antennitarvikkeet: Antennikaapelit ja -pigtailit; Antennin maadoitus- ja asennustarvike; Antennien kiinnitys ja kannattimet; Kääntömoottorit; Antennin virittäjät; Balunit ja duplekserit; Salamaniskusuojat ja ylijännitesuojat; RF-adapterit ja -liittimet; Lautasantennin mikroaaltopäät; Jakajat, yhdistimet ja jakelujärjestelmät
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Antény – příslušenství: Anténní kabely a pigtaily; Hardware pro uzemnění a instalaci antén; Montážní sady a držáky na antény; Anténní rotátory; Ladičky antén; Baluny a duplexery; Bleskojistky a přepěťové ochrany; RF adaptéry a konektory; Satelitní konvertory; Rozdělovače, kombinátory a distribuční systémy
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Antennakiegészítők: Antennakábelek és pigtail-kábelek; Antennaföldelés és telepítési hardver; Antennarögzítők és -konzolok; Antennaforgatók; Antennahangolók; Balunok és duplexerek; Villámhárítók és túlfeszültségvédők; RF-adapterek és -csatlakozók; Műholdas LNB-k; Elosztók, kombinátorok és elosztórendszerek
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Antenntillbehör: Antennkablar och svansanslutningar; Antennjordning och monteringstillbehör; Antennmonteringar och fästen; Antennrotorer; Antennavstämmare; Baluner och duplexrar; Åskledare och överspänningsskydd; RF-adaptrar och kontakter; LNB för parabolantenner; Fördelare, kombinerare och distributionssystem
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Antenna Accessories: Antenna Cables & Pigtails; Antenna Grounding & Installation Hardware; Antenna Mounts & Brackets; Antenna Rotators; Antenna Tuners; Baluns & Duplexers; Lightning Arresters & Surge Protectors; RF Adapters & Connectors; Satellite LNBs; Splitters, Combiners & Distribution Systems
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Accesorii pentru antene: Cabluri și pigtailuri pentru antene; Hardware de împământare și instalare pentru antene; Suporturi și console pentru antene; Dispozitive pentru rotirea antenelor; Tunere pentru antene; Balunuri și duplexoare; Paratrăsnete și protectoare la supratensiuni; Adaptoare și conectori RF; LNB pentru antene satelit; Splittere, combinatoare și sisteme de distribuție
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Αξεσουάρ κεραιών: Καλώδια & pigtails κεραίας; Εξοπλισμός γείωσης & εγκατάστασης κεραίας; Βάσεις & στηρίγματα κεραιών; Περιστροφείς κεραιών; Συντονιστές κεραίας; Baluns & duplexers; Αλεξικέραυνα & προστασία από υπερτάσεις; Προσαρμογείς & συνδέσμοι RF; Δορυφορικοί ενισχυτές χαμηλού θορύβου (LNBs); Διαχωριστές, συνδυαστές & συστήματα διανομής
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện anten: Cáp anten và dây pigtail; Phần cứng nối đất và cài đặt anten; Đế và chân đế anten; Bộ xoay anten; Bộ điều chỉnh anten; Balun và duplexer; Bộ chống sét và bảo vệ tăng vọt; Bộ chuyển đổi và đầu nối RF; Bộ chuyển đổi tần số sóng vệ tinh; Bộ tách, bộ kết hợp và hệ thống phân phối
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Akcesoria do anten: Kable i przewody antenowe; Uziemienie anteny i sprzęt instalacyjny; Uchwyty i wsporniki do anten; Rotory antenowe; Tunery anten; Balun i dupleksery; Osłonniki piorunowe i ochronniki przepięciowe; Adaptery i złącza RF; Konwertery satelitarne; Rozdzielacze, łączniki i systemy dystrybucji
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Antenneaccessoires: Antenne kabels en pigtails; Antenne aarding en installatie hardware; Antennebeugels en -ophangsystemen; Antennerotoren; Antenne tuners; Baluns en duplexers; Bliksemafleiders en overspanningsbeveiligers; RF adapters en connectoren; Satelliet-LNB's; Splitters, combiners en distributiesystemen
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Аксессуары для антенн: Антенные кабели и пигтейлы; Заземление антенн и монтажное оборудование; Опорные механизмы и кронштейны для антенн; Поворотные устройства для антенн; Антенные тюнеры; Балуны и дуплексеры; Грозоразрядники и устройства защиты от перенапряжения; РЧ-адаптеры и разъемы; Спутниковые конвертеры; Разветвители, сумматоры и распределительные системы
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Antennenzubehör: Antennenkabel und -Pigtails; Antennen-Erdungs- und -Installationsmaterial; Antennenhalterungen & -befestigungen; Dreheinrichtungen; Antennentuner; Baluns und Duplexer; Blitzableiter und Überspannungsschutz; HF-Adapter und -Verbinder; Satelliten-LNBs; Splitter, Combiner und Verteilsysteme
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Accessori per antenna: Cavi e pigtail dell'antenna; Hardware di messa a terra e installazione dell'antenna; Supporti e staffe antenne; Rotatori per antenna; Sintonizzatori d'antenna; Balun e duplexer; Scaricatori di fulmine e protezioni da sovratensione; Adattatori e connettori RF; LNB satellitari; Splitter, combinatori e sistemi di distribuzione
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Acessórios de antena: Cabos e pigtails para antena; Hardware de ligação à terra e instalação para antena; Suportes e apoios de antena; Rotores de antena; Sintonizadores de antena; Baluns e duplexers; Para-raios e protetores contra sobretensão; Adaptadores e conectores rf; LNB satélite; Divisores, combinadores e sistemas de distribuição
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์เสาอากาศ: สายเสาอากาศและสายพิกเทล; อุปกรณ์ต่อสายดินและติดตั้งเสาอากาศ; ที่ตั้งและแท่นรองรับเสาอากาศ; ที่หมุนเสาอากาศ; ตัวปรับเสาอากาศ; บาลันและดูเพล็กซ์เซอร์; สายล่อฟ้าและอุปกรณ์ป้องกันไฟกระชาก; อะแดปเตอร์และตัวเชื่อมต่อ RF; LNB ดาวเทียม; ตัวแยก ตัวรวม และระบบกระจายสัญญาณ